District of Columbia statutes.
10-1121.02

Mayor’s authority with respect to use of airspace.

The Mayor, in conformity with the comprehensive plan for the National Capital prepared under § 2-1003, may:

(1)

Enter into leases for the use of airspace in the District to an extent not inconsistent with the use, operation, and maintenance of, any street or alley;

(2)

Use airspace for such public purposes as are authorized by law;

(3)

Enter into agreements with the federal government for the purpose of receiving grants or other financial assistance under the federal programs in connection with the construction, use or operation of any structure in airspace; and

(4)

Enter into agreements with the federal government to enable the federal government to construct federal buildings in the space above and below any street or alley, title to which is in the District.

History

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1166, Pub. L. 90-598, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1032.
1973 Ed., § 7-942.

Mayor's Orders

District of Columbia Public Space Committee established: See Mayor’s Order 83-54, February 17, 1983.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.